Rhode Island statutes. Title 41 Sports, Racing, and Athletics
Chapter 5 Boxing and Wrestling

41-5-1.
License required for boxing exhibitions — Amateur exhibitions exempt.

No boxing or sparring match or exhibition for a prize or a purse, or at which an admission fee is charged, either directly or indirectly, in the form of dues or otherwise, shall take place or be conducted in this state unless licensed by the division of gaming and athletics licensing in accordance with this chapter; provided, however, that the provisions of this chapter shall not apply to any boxing or sparring match or exhibition in which the contestants are amateurs and that is conducted under the supervision and control of:

Any educational institution recognized by the council on postsecondary education and the council on elementary and secondary education of this state; or

Any religious or charitable organization or society engaged in the training of youth and recognized as such by the division of gaming and athletics licensing of this state.

For the purposes of this section, an “amateur” shall be deemed to mean a person who engages in boxing or sparring contests or exhibitions for which no cash prizes are awarded to the participants, and for which the prize competed for, if any, shall not exceed in value the sum of twenty-five dollars ($25.00).

History of Section.

P.L. 1926, ch. 772, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 16, § 4; P.L. 1940, ch. 886, § 1; impl. am. P.L. 1946, ch. 1746, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

41-5-1

; P.L. 2016, ch. 528, § 5.

41-5-2.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1926, ch. 772, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 16, § 4; P.L. 1940, ch. 886, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

41-5-2

; P.L. 1986, ch. 10, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 1, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 75, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 560, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 140, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 458, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 103, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2003, ch. 313, § 1, effective July 17, 2003; P.L. 2003, ch. 399, § 1, effective July 17, 2003.

41-5-3.
Application for license.

The division of gaming and athletics licensing, in the discretion of its chairperson or other officer charged with the enforcement of this chapter, may require any person applying for a license to furnish such information and references as it may desire. Applications for the license shall be accompanied by a fee of not less than ten dollars ($10.00) nor more than eight hundred dollars ($800), as the division shall fix. Voluntary or unincorporated associations shall not be entitled to receive a license, and applications in their behalf shall be made in the name of one or more officers thereof.

History of Section.

P.L. 1926, ch. 772, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 16, § 4; P.L. 1940, ch. 886, § 1; impl. am. P.L. 1946, ch. 1746, § 13; G.L. 1956, §

41-5-3

; P.L. 1960, ch. 74, § 20; P.L. 1984, ch. 399, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 528, § 5.

41-5-3.1.
Required information on application.

In addition to other information and references as the division of gaming and athletics licensing may require, an application for a license under §

41-5-1

shall include:

A card or schedule of all persons who will perform as boxers in the boxing or sparring match or exhibition for which the license is sought;

The full, legal name of each person, every professional or stage name used by him or her, and his or her date of birth and social security number;

A current passport-type photograph of each person;

The complete fight record of each person for the nine (9) months prior to the boxing or sparring match or exhibition for which the license is sought, including the full, legal name of his or her opponent, any professional or stage name used by his or her opponent at the time of the match or exhibition, and the date, place, and result of the match or exhibition;

An itemization of the gross receipts and the expenses anticipated by the applicant in the conduct of the boxing or sparring match or exhibition for which the license is sought;

A detailed summary of the contractual agreement between the applicant and each person who will perform as a boxer in the boxing or sparring match or exhibition for which the license is sought, including, among other things, the pecuniary gain or other consideration to be paid to or on behalf of each person by reason of his or her performance in the match or exhibition; and

The name, date of birth, and social security number of the person who will collect, hold, and transmit to the general treasurer, on behalf of the applicant, the sums mentioned in §

41-5-1

5.

Notwithstanding the issuance of a license to an applicant under §

41-5-1

, the license shall not be valid unless the holder thereof shall file with the division a sworn supplementary application updating the original application. The supplementary application shall be filed not more than thirty-six (36) nor less than twelve (12) hours prior to the starting time for the first event in the match or exhibition for which the holder has been licensed. In the event that the licensed match or exhibition is scheduled to be held on a day that is not an ordinary business day for the division, the supplementary application shall be filed with the division not less than six (6) hours prior to the close of the last ordinary business day for the division next before the scheduled day of the match or exhibition.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 399, § 2; P.L. 2016, ch. 528, § 5.

41-5-3.2.
License issued only to ring equipment owner.

No license shall be issued by the division of gaming and athletics licensing under §

41-5-1

to an applicant unless the applicant is the sole owner of the ring equipment to be used in the conduct of the boxing or sparring match or exhibition for which the license is sought. The division shall require that satisfactory proof of ownership accompany each application. Sole ownership includes any lease or rental agreement under which the applicant enjoys control and custody of the ring equipment substantially equivalent to that of a sole owner.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 399, § 2; P.L. 2016, ch. 528, § 5.

41-5-3.3.
Insurance required.

No license issued by the division of gaming and athletics licensing under §

41-5-1

shall be valid unless the license holder shall:

Within thirty-six (36) hours of the starting time for the first event in the licensed boxing or sparring match or exhibition, have, in force, such contracts or policies of public liability insurance and such other contracts or policies of insurance in such amounts as the division shall reasonably require in connection with the conduct of the match or exhibition; and

Within twenty-four (24) hours of the starting time, furnish to the division satisfactory proof that the insurance is in force.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 399, § 2; P.L. 2016, ch. 528, § 5.

41-5-3.4.
Promotion prohibited until license issued.

No boxing or sparring match for which a license is required under §

41-5-1

shall be advertised, announced, or otherwise publicly promoted until:

The license therefor has been issued by the division of gaming and athletics licensing; or

The division approves the promotion after a substantially complete application for the license has been filed with the division.

A violation of this section shall be adequate ground for the denial or revocation of a license.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 399, § 2; P.L. 1986, ch. 198, § 30; P.L. 2016, ch. 528, § 5.

41-5-3.5.
Inspections of premises and equipment required.

No license shall be issued under §

41-5-1

unless the division of gaming and athletics licensing shall have inspected the building where the boxing or sparring match or exhibition is to be conducted and determined that the building is suitable for the proposed boxing or sparring match or exhibition. In determining suitability, the division shall consider the proposed location for the ring, the adequacy of the shower and dressing facilities for the performers, and all other matters relevant to the public welfare. The division shall re-inspect the premises within forty-eight (48) hours of the starting time for the first event in the licensed match or exhibition and, for good cause, may determine that the premises are no longer suitable, in which case the license for the match or exhibition shall be revoked absolutely or subject to reinstatement upon such terms and conditions as the division deems appropriate.

At least four (4) hours prior to the starting time for the first event in a licensed boxing or sparring match or exhibition, the division shall examine all equipment to be used by the performers during the match or exhibition, including ring equipment, gloves, and protector cups. In the event that for good cause the division determines that the conduct of the match or exhibition with the equipment is not consistent with the highest regard for the safety and well-being of the performers or the public, the license for the match or exhibition shall be revoked absolutely or subject to reinstatement upon such terms and conditions as the division deems appropriate.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 399, § 2; P.L. 2016, ch. 528, § 5.

41-5-3.6.
Substitutions.

No substitution of boxers may be made within twenty-three (23) hours of the starting time for the first event in the boxing or sparring match or exhibition. If one or more of the boxers listed on the licensee’s application fails to appear for his or her examination in the office of the division of gaming and athletics licensing as prescribed in §

41-5-11

, or to enter the ring and perform, and substitution is not permitted under this section or any other section of this chapter, the contest or contests in which the boxer or boxers were to appear shall be cancelled and notice of the cancellation shall be made to the public at the earliest practicable time.

Any person who paid an admission fee prior to the making of the notice shall, at his or her election, be entitled to an immediate refund of the admission fee unless the principal draw in the match or exhibition appeared and performed prior to the making of the notice.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 399, § 2; P.L. 2006, ch. 216, § 37; P.L. 2016, ch. 528, § 5.

41-5-3.7.
Closed-circuit television.

No closed-circuit television shows of matches or exhibitions shall be permitted in the state unless the promoter has first obtained a permit from the division of gaming and athletics licensing. A promoter shall submit the application on a form provided by the division and the application shall contain information pertaining to the dates, locations, and cities in which the matches shall be shown.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 399, § 2; P.L. 2016, ch. 528, § 5.

41-5-4.
Penalty for unlicensed match.

Any person holding, conducting, or participating in any match or exhibition held without a license, unless exempted as provided herein, shall be punished by a fine not exceeding one hundred dollars ($100) or by imprisonment for a term not exceeding three (3) months, or by both a fine and imprisonment.

History of Section.

P.L. 1926, ch. 772, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 16, § 4; P.L. 1940, ch. 886, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

41-5-4

.

41-5-5.
Separate license for each match — Approval of city or town authorities.

The division of gaming and athletics licensing shall, subject to the provisions of this chapter, issue a separate license for each boxing or sparring match and exhibition; provided, however, that no license shall be issued by the division without the approval of the town council, police commissioner, board of police commissioners, or other licensing board of the city or town in which the boxing or sparring match or exhibition is to be held.

History of Section.

P.L. 1926, ch. 772, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 16, § 5; impl. am. P.L. 1946, ch. 1746, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

41-5-5

; P.L. 2016, ch. 528, § 5.

41-5-6.
Surety bond filed by licensee.

No license as provided in §

41-5-1

shall be granted unless the licensee has executed and filed, with the division of gaming and athletics licensing, a bond, in such penal sum and with such surety or sureties as shall be satisfactory to the division, running to the state, conditioned upon the payment to the state of the sums mentioned in §

41-5-1

5, and upon faithful compliance by the licensee with the provisions of this chapter, the rules and regulations of the division, and with such other laws of the state as may be applicable to anything done by the licensee in pursuance of the license.

History of Section.

P.L. 1926, ch. 772, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 16, § 6; impl. am. P.L. 1946, ch. 1746, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

41-5-6

; P.L. 1984, ch. 399, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 148; P.L. 2016, ch. 528, § 5.

41-5-7.
License required for participants and officials in professional matches.

No person shall act, except at a purely amateur match or exhibition, directly or indirectly, as physician, first-aid instructor, referee, judge, timekeeper, professional boxer, or as manager, trainer, or second of a boxer, at a boxing or sparring match or exhibition unless licensed by the division of gaming and athletics licensing. For the purposes of this chapter, a “professional boxer” is defined as one who competes for a money prize or teaches or pursues or assists in the practice of boxing as a means of obtaining a livelihood or pecuniary gain.

In addition to the license requirements set forth in the preceding paragraph, the division of gaming and athletics licensing shall have the authority to select referees for boxing, sparring, or exhibition matches.

History of Section.

P.L. 1926, ch. 772, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 16, § 7; impl. am. P.L. 1946, ch. 1746, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

41-5-7

; P.L. 1984, ch. 399, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 94, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 528, § 5.

41-5-7.1.
Required information on boxer’s application for license — Medical examination.

After a license is granted under §

41-5-1

for a boxing or sparring match or exhibition, no person shall perform as a boxer in the match or exhibition unless he or she shall have been licensed by the division of gaming and athletics licensing at least twenty-four (24) hours prior to the starting time for the first event in the match or exhibition. In addition to such other information and references as the division may require, an application to be licensed as a boxer shall be sworn to by the applicant under oath, upon the pains and penalties of perjury, and shall include:

A detailed summary of the contractual agreement between the applicant and the licensee for the boxing or sparring match or exhibition for which the applicant seeks to be licensed as a boxer, including, among other things, the pecuniary gain or other consideration to be paid to, or on behalf of, the applicant by reason of his or her performance in the match or exhibition;

A detailed description of every illness, injury, or other incapacity suffered by the licensee within six (6) months of the boxing or sparring match or exhibition for which the applicant seeks to be licensed as a boxer, including the dates of each illness, injury, or other incapacity, the name and address of all persons who treated or examined the applicant, the nature of the treatment prescribed (including the generic name for any medications or medicines prescribed), and whether the applicant has recovered;

The complete fight record of the applicant for the twelve (12) months prior to the boxing or sparring match or exhibition for which the applicant seeks to be licensed as a boxer, including the full, legal name of his or her opponent, any professional or stage name used by his or her opponent at the time of the match or exhibition, and the date, place, and results of the match or exhibition;

The date and circumstances of any disqualification, sanction, or denial of permission to box imposed against the applicant by any state authority governing boxing within nine (9) months of the boxing or sparring match for which the applicant seeks to be licensed as a boxer;

The full, legal name of the applicant, every professional or stage name used by him or her, and his or her date of birth and social security number; and

A current passport-type photograph of the applicant.

Notwithstanding the issuance of a license to an applicant, the license shall not be valid unless the holder thereof shall file with the division a sworn, supplementary application updating his or her original application. The supplementary application shall be filed not more than forty-eight (48) nor less than twenty-four (24) hours prior to the starting time for the first event in the match or exhibition for which the holder has been licensed; provided, however, that no supplementary application shall be required when an original application has been filed within such time; provided further, however, that in no event shall an original or supplementary application be filed with the division less than six (6) hours of the closing of business on the last ordinary business day of the division next occurring before the day on which the match or exhibition is scheduled to be conducted.

Every application for a license under §

41-5-3

by a person seeking to be licensed as a boxer shall be accompanied by the report of a physician duly licensed by the division. The report shall certify whether the applicant is fit to perform as a boxer and shall be based on a recently conducted complete examination of the applicant. The report shall contain a complete medical history of the applicant and the results of the tests conducted by or on behalf of the examining physician as the medical history of the applicant warrants or as are material to the physician’s certification.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 399, § 2; P.L. 2016, ch. 528, § 5; P.L. 2020, ch. 79, art. 1, § 40.

41-5-8.
Referees — Powers.

At every boxing or sparring match or exhibition there shall be in attendance a referee, duly licensed under the provisions of this chapter, who shall direct and control the boxing match, sparring match, or exhibition. The referee shall have full power to stop the match whenever he or she deems it advisable because of the physical condition of any contestants, or when one of the contestants is clearly outclassed by his or her opponents, or for other sufficient reason and that no fighter who has been knocked down shall be allowed to continue until he or she has taken a mandatory eight (8) count. The referee shall have power in his or her discretion to declare forfeited any prize, remuneration, or purse or any part thereof belonging to any contestants if, in his or her judgment, the contestant or contestants are not or were not competing in good faith. The physician in attendance shall examine the referee prior to each bout or event and certify whether he or she is capable of performing his or her duties based upon the examination. In all championship bouts held in Rhode Island, first consideration shall be given to referees in good standing residing in Rhode Island. The referee has the right to award a boxer injured by a foul or inappropriate action from one to five (5) minutes to recover after time has been called.

History of Section.

P.L. 1926, ch. 772, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 16, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

41-5-8

; P.L. 1984, ch. 399, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 388, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 439, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 139, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 159, § 1.

41-5-9.
Attendance of judges — Decision.

The division of gaming and athletics licensing may, in its discretion, require the attendance at any boxing or sparring match or exhibition of three (3) judges licensed by the division whose duty it shall be to render a decision at the termination of the boxing or sparring match or exhibition. The decision shall be reached by the judges using the “10-point must system” as the standard of judgment for all decisions.

History of Section.

P.L. 1926, ch. 772, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 16, § 8; impl. am. P.L. 1946, ch. 1746, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

41-5-9

; P.L. 1984, ch. 399, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 294, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 528, § 5.

41-5-9.1.
Duties of director at ringside.

It shall be the duty of the director of business regulation, or his or her designee, to certify at ringside the results of each event in a match or exhibition licensed under §

41-5-1

, and to send an official report of the results to every state boxing authority in the New England states and to the World Boxing Association, World Boxing Council, United States Boxing Association, and Ring magazine.

The director of business regulation, or his or her designee, shall submit to the division forthwith after a match or exhibition licensed under §

41-5-1

a written evaluation of the conduct of the match or exhibition, including an appraisal of the licensee’s performance and of the conduct and condition of the performers and recommendations for the better conduct of matches or exhibitions in the future.

All reports of results or written evaluations made by the director shall be public records.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 399, § 2; P.L. 1987, ch. 118, art. 25, § 5.

41-5-10.
Fees of officials.

The fees of the referee and other licensed officials, as established by this chapter, shall be fixed by the division of gaming and athletics licensing, and shall be paid by the licensed organization prior to the exhibition.

History of Section.

P.L. 1926, ch. 772, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 16, § 8; impl. am. P.L. 1946, ch. 1746, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

41-5-10

; P.L. 2016, ch. 528, § 5.

41-5-11.
Physician and first-aid instructor or licensed practical nurse in attendance — Examination of participants before match.

At any boxing or sparring match or exhibition there shall be in attendance, at ringside, a duly licensed physician, whose duty it shall be to observe the physical condition of the boxers and to advise the referee or judges with regard thereto, and a duly licensed first-aid instructor or licensed practical nurse whose duty it shall be to assist the physician and to render such aid to boxers as circumstances may require. Any competent physician who has had not less than three (3) years’ experience as a medical practitioner may be licensed. Any person holding a valid certification as a first-aid instructor issued by any state chapter of the American Red Cross association and who is competent as such may be licensed.

The fee for the physician in attendance and the first-aid instructor in attendance shall be fixed by the division of gaming and athletics licensing and shall be paid by the licensee conducting the match or exhibition. The fees shall be tendered to the division at the time the license for the match or exhibition is issued under §

41-5-1

, to be held by the division in escrow until the services are rendered.

No boxer shall be permitted to box unless, not more than three (3) hours before, a physician, licensed under this chapter, shall certify, in writing, that the boxer is physically fit to engage in the proposed contest. The certification shall be based in part on an examination of the boxer by a duly licensed physician in the office of the division on the morning of the match or exhibition or at least six (6) hours before the boxer is scheduled to enter the ring, whichever is earlier. The physician’s fee, as fixed by the division, shall be paid by the licensee conducting the match or exhibition prior to the issuance of the certification by the physician. In the event that a boxer cannot be certified as physically fit to engage in the proposed contest, then that fact shall be made known to the public prior to the acceptance of an admission fee or the tender of an admission ticket for the match or exhibition. Any person who pays an admission fee prior to the disclosure that the boxer is not certified as physically fit shall, at his or her election, be entitled to an immediate refund of the admission fee. The examinations required by this section shall include an examination of the boxer’s vision and eye condition.

History of Section.

P.L. 1926, ch. 772, § 8; G.L. 1938, ch. 16, § 9; impl. am. P.L. 1946, ch. 1746, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

41-5-11

; P.L. 1984, ch. 399, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 94, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 216, § 37; P.L. 2016, ch. 528, § 5.

41-5-11.1.
Drug and H.I.V. testing.

All contestants in a professional boxing or professional kickboxing match shall submit to drug and H.I.V. testing under such rules and regulations and for such drugs as the division of gaming and athletics licensing shall prescribe. The costs of the drug testing shall be paid by the contestant and/or promoter for the boxing or kickboxing match.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 94, § 2; P.L. 1996, ch. 240, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 528, § 5.

41-5-11.2.
Health insurance.

All contestants in a boxing or sparring match shall carry such health insurance as the division of gaming and athletics licensing shall prescribe, and shall furnish satisfactory proof of insurance to the division prior to participating in any boxing or sparring match.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 94, § 2; P.L. 2005, ch. 37, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 150, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 528, § 5.

41-5-12.
Duration of matches — Gloves — Maximum participation by contestant.

Boxing or sparring matches or exhibitions shall not exceed twelve (12) rounds in length, and no round shall exceed three (3) minutes. The contestants shall wear, during the contest, gloves weighing ten (10) ounces for contestants one hundred fifty-four pounds (154 lbs.) or greater and eight-ounce (8) gloves for contestants less than one hundred fifty-four pounds (154 lbs.). The gloves shall be of the webbed thumb variety. No contestant shall participate in more than twelve (12) rounds during any period of twenty-four (24) hours. A rest period of at least sixty (60) seconds shall separate each round. In the event that a boxer’s mouthpiece or other protective gear is damaged, there may be an interruption of the round when there is a lull in the action as determined by the referee. Protective headgear shall not be required; provided, however, that upon written application filed by both participating boxers not less than twenty-four (24) hours prior to a match or exhibition, the division of gaming and athletics licensing may review the match or exhibition to be performed and may waive such provisions of this section as the division deems appropriate for the particular event to be performed. The application shall be subscribed to before a notary public or two (2) witnesses who shall affix their respective signatures and addresses thereto under the pain and penalty of perjury.

History of Section.

P.L. 1926, ch. 772, § 9; G.L. 1938, ch. 16, § 10; P.L. 1939, ch. 711, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

41-5-12

; P.L. 1984, ch. 399, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 4, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 94, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 37, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 150, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 388, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 439, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 528, § 5.

41-5-12.1.
Number of corner persons.

In any boxing or sparring match there shall be not more than three (3) corner persons for each contestant.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 94, § 2; P.L. 2007, ch. 388, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 439, § 1.

41-5-13.
Minimum age of contestants.

No contestant under eighteen (18) years of age shall be permitted to engage in any boxing or sparring match or exhibition.

History of Section.

P.L. 1926, ch. 772, § 10; G.L. 1938, ch. 16, § 11; G.L. 1956, §

41-5-13

; P.L. 1987, ch. 94, § 1.

41-5-13.1.
Physical knockouts.

Any boxer suffering a physical knockout during a boxing or sparring match or exhibition licensed under §

41-5-1

shall, at the request of his or her manager or the division of gaming and athletics licensing, undergo a magnetic resonant imaging (MRI) or computerized tomography (CT) test scan within twenty-four (24) hours of the request. Failure to comply with the request within the prescribed time shall cause the boxer’s license under §

41-5-7

to be revoked by operation of law and shall render the boxer permanently ineligible for future licensing under §

41-5-7

.

The license under §

41-5-7

of any boxer suffering five (5) physical knockouts in any twelve-month (12) period shall be revoked by operation of law and the boxer shall be permanently ineligible for future licensing under §

41-5-7

.

Every boxer suffering a physical knockout, at the discretion of the division of gaming and athletics licensing, shall be ineligible to perform in a boxing or sparring match or exhibition licensed under §

41-5-1

until sixty (60) days have elapsed following the date of the knockout. The license under §

41-5-7

of every boxer shall be revoked by operation of law whenever he or she suffers a physical knockout.

Every boxer suffering a physical knockout during a boxing or sparring match or exhibition licensed under §

41-5-1

shall submit to an examination by the physician in attendance immediately following his or her removal from the ring and shall, within two (2) hours of the knockout, submit to a complete examination at a local hospital named by the physician in attendance.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 399, § 2; P.L. 1986, ch. 198, § 30; P.L. 2007, ch. 388, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 439, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 528, § 5.

41-5-13.2.
Facial lacerations.

The license under §

41-5-7

of any boxer who suffers a laceration over or about an eye or nose during a boxing or sparring match licensed under §

41-5-1

shall be revoked by operation of law, and the boxer shall not be eligible for future licensing under §

41-5-7

until a duly licensed physician certifies that the laceration is properly healed and not a cause to withhold licensing under § 41-5-7.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 399, § 2.

41-5-14.
Interest in contestant by promoter prohibited — Forfeiture of contestant’s purse.

No licensee under this chapter shall have, directly or indirectly, any financial interest in a boxer competing on premises owned or leased by the licensee, or in which the licensee is otherwise interested. No contestant in a match or exhibition shall be paid for services before the services are rendered, and, should it be determined by the judges and referee that a contestant did not give an honest exhibition of his or her skill, his or her services shall not be remunerated.

History of Section.

P.L. 1926, ch. 772, § 14; G.L. 1938, ch. 16, § 15; G.L. 1956, §

41-5-14

; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 148.

41-5-15.
Tax on admissions — Accounting and payment — State inspector.

Every licensee holding or conducting any professional boxing or sparring match or exhibition shall, after its conclusion, pay to the general treasurer for the use of the state a sum equal to five percent (5%) of the total gross receipts from the sale of tickets and from admission fees; provided, however, that every licensee holding or conducting any amateur boxing or sparring match or exhibition shall, at its conclusion, pay to the general treasurer a sum equal to five percent (5%) of the gross receipts up to one thousand dollars ($1,000) and five percent (5%) of the balance of the gross receipts; provided, further, however, that if the match or exhibition is conducted as an incidental feature in an event or entertainment of a different character, the portion of the total receipts shall be paid to the state as the division of gaming and athletics licensing may determine or as may be fixed by rule adopted under §

41-5-22

. Within seventy-two (72) hours after the conclusion of the match or exhibition, the licensee shall furnish to the division a report, sworn under oath upon the pains and penalties of perjury, showing the exact number of tickets sold and admission fees collected for the contest, and the gross receipts thereof, and such other data as the division may require. All fees for licenses and other income of the division shall be turned over to the general treasurer for the use of the state. No licensee shall distribute more than fifty (50) complimentary tickets in any one event.

For each match or exhibition, the division, through its inspector and upon the conclusion of the collection of admission fees for the match or exhibition, may examine the box-office admission figures, the admission statements maintained by, or on behalf of, the licensee, and such other data as the division may direct. Forthwith upon the conclusion of the match or exhibition, the licensee shall tender to the state inspector the sums mentioned in this section. Written acceptance of the tender shall be signed by the inspector and counter signed by the licensee or an agent of the licensee.

History of Section.

P.L. 1926, ch. 772, § 11; G.L. 1938, ch. 16, § 12; P.L. 1945, ch. 1541, § 1; impl. am. P.L. 1946, ch. 1746, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

41-5-15

; P.L. 1984, ch. 399, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 528, § 5.

41-5-16.
Overcrowding of buildings — Ventilation and safety requirements.

It shall be unlawful for any licensee under this chapter to sell, or cause to be sold or issued, more tickets or invitations purporting to admit to any match or exhibition, or otherwise to admit to any match or exhibition, more persons than are admissible according to the authorized capacity of the building, or part thereof actually used therefor. All buildings or structures used, or intended to be used, for the purpose of this chapter shall be properly ventilated and provided with fire escapes, if there need be, and in all manner conform to the laws, ordinances, and regulations pertaining to buildings of the city or town where situated. The provisions of this section shall also apply to buildings, portions of which are used for the purpose set forth in this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1926, ch. 772, § 12; G.L. 1938, ch. 16, § 13; G.L. 1956, §

41-5-16

; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 148.

41-5-17.
Suspension or revocation of license.

Any license granted under this chapter may be revoked or suspended by the division of gaming and athletics licensing for a violation of any of the provisions of this chapter or of any other law of the state or of any rule or regulation adopted by the division or whenever the licensee has, in the judgment of the division, been guilty of any act or offense detrimental to the public interest.

History of Section.

P.L. 1926, ch. 772, § 13; G.L. 1938, ch. 16, § 14; impl. am. P.L. 1946, ch. 1746, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

41-5-17

; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 148; P.L. 2016, ch. 528, § 5.

41-5-18.
Betting prohibited.

Whoever bets or wagers or sells pools on any boxing or sparring match or exhibition shall be punished by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100), or by imprisonment for not less than three (3) months, or by both a fine and imprisonment.

History of Section.

P.L. 1926, ch. 772, § 15; G.L. 1938, ch. 16, § 16; G.L. 1956, §

41-5-18

.

41-5-19.
Witnesses and evidence before division.

The division of gaming and athletics licensing shall have power to administer oaths; summon and examine witnesses; and order the production and examination of books, accounts, papers, and records of any club or organization conducting a boxing or sparring match or exhibition.

History of Section.

P.L. 1926, ch. 772, § 16; G.L. 1938, ch. 16, § 17; impl. am. P.L. 1946, ch. 1746, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

41-5-19

; P.L. 2016, ch. 528, § 5.

41-5-20.
Injunction and abatement of unauthorized matches.

The superior court shall have jurisdiction in equity upon any information filed by the division of gaming and athletics licensing, the attorney general of the state, the police authorities of the city or town in which the boxing or sparring match or exhibition is held, or is announced to be held, or of any five (5) legal voters of the state, stating that a certain building, tenement, or place is used for boxing or sparring matches or exhibitions by an individual, group, partnership, club, corporation, or association that is not licensed under this chapter, or contrary to the terms of this chapter; or that a boxing or sparring match or exhibition is being advertised or announced, or has been advertised, or announced to take place in a certain building or place, or that a certain individual, club, corporation, or association is selling, exchanging, or giving away tickets, tokens, or symbols purporting to entitle the holder to the right or privilege of attending a certain boxing or sparring match or exhibition that is not licensed by the division and is contrary to this chapter, to enjoin and abate the unauthorized match as a common nuisance.

History of Section.

P.L. 1926, ch. 772, § 17; G.L. 1938, ch. 16, § 18; impl. am. P.L. 1946, ch. 1746, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

41-5-20

; P.L. 2016, ch. 528, § 5.

41-5-20.1.
Refunds required upon license revocation.

In the event that a boxing or sparring match or exhibition is not conducted by reason of the revocation of the license issued under §

41-5-1

for the match or exhibition, all persons who paid an admission fee for the match or exhibition are entitled to an immediate refund of the admission fee.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 399, § 2.

41-5-21.
Application of chapter to wrestling matches.

The division of gaming and athletics licensing shall have and exercise the same authority, supervision, and control over wrestling and exhibitions as is conferred upon the division by this chapter over boxing and sparring matches and exhibitions, and the provisions of this chapter, except those of §

41-5-12

, shall apply in all respects to wrestling matches and exhibitions to the same extent, and with the same force and effect, as they apply to boxing and sparring matches.

Whenever in this chapter, except in §

41-5-12

, the words “boxing or sparring match or exhibition,” or the plural form thereof, are used, they shall be construed to include the words “wrestling match or exhibition,” or the plural form thereof, and the word “boxer” shall be construed to include “wrestler,” unless the context otherwise requires, and any person holding, conducting, or participating in a wrestling match or exhibition shall be subject to the same duties, liabilities, licensing requirements, penalties, and fees as are imposed by this chapter upon any person holding, conducting, or participating in a boxing or sparring match or exhibition.

For the purpose of this chapter, a “professional wrestler” is defined as one who competes for a money prize, or teaches or pursues or assists in the practice of wrestling, as a means of obtaining a livelihood or pecuniary gain.

The division of gaming and athletics licensing may waive the provisions of this chapter within its discretion in the case of wrestling as a form of pre-determined entertainment.

History of Section.

P.L. 1926, ch. 772, § 19; P.L. 1927, ch. 963, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 16, § 20; impl. am. P.L. 1946, ch. 1746, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

41-5-21

; 1984, ch. 399, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 388, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 439, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 20, § 21; P.L. 2016, ch. 528, § 5.

41-5-22.
Rules and regulations.

The department of business regulation may make rules and regulations for the administration and enforcement of this chapter as it may deem necessary. Provided, further, notwithstanding any provision of the general or public laws to the contrary, the department of business regulation shall have the power to adopt by rule or regulation, in whole or in part, any standards, rules, regulations, handbooks, or other standards and procedures governing boxing as approved by the Association of Boxing Commissions. The rules and regulations may also provide for, and regulate the granting of, a special permit for exhibitions where no decision is to be rendered and where a skilled boxer or boxers merely demonstrate the science of boxing.

History of Section.

P.L. 1926, ch. 772, § 18; G.L. 1938, ch. 16, § 19; impl. am. P.L. 1946, ch. 1746, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

41-5-22

; P.L. 2014, ch. 159, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 196, § 1.